District of Columbia statutes.
3-1207.51

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Board” means the Board of Pharmacy.

(2)

“Direct supervision” means, with respect to the supervision of a pharmacy technician or pharmacy technician trainee, that a licensed pharmacist is:

(A)

Physically present at the same pharmacy as the pharmacy technician or pharmacy technician trainee and in the general vicinity of the pharmacy technician or pharmacy technician trainee;

(B)

Readily available to answer questions of the pharmacy technician or pharmacy technician trainee;

(C)

Making appropriate in-process and end-process verifications of the activities of the pharmacy technician or pharmacy technician trainee; and

(D)

Fully responsible for the practice of the pharmacy technician or pharmacy technician trainee.

(3)

“Pharmacy technician trainee” means a person enrolled in a Board- approved training program who may perform the duties of a registered pharmacy technician under the direct supervision of a pharmacist in a licensed pharmacy in the District.

(4)

“Registered pharmacy technician” means a person who is registered with the Board as a pharmacy technician.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 751
as added May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-303, § 2(d), 60 DCR 2711

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-303 added this subchapter.